apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="l/yde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ød</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yde</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yder</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tilb/yde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ød</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yde</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yder</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydes</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="afbr/yde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yde</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>udt</l>
          <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/yge__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øg</l>
          <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yge</l>
          <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ygende</l>
          <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øget</l>
          <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yger</l>
          <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/ynge__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynge</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynger</l>
          <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/ynke__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ank</l>
          <r>ynke<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynke</l>
          <r>ynke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unket</l>
          <r>ynke<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynkende</l>
          <r>ynke<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynker</l>
          <r>ynke<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fl/yve__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øj</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yve</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øjet</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/yve__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øj</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øjet</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yver</l>
          <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vil/le__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/ulle__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/unne__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnet</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ak__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

      <e>
        <i>afbr</i>
        <par n="afbr/yde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fl</i>
        <par n="fl/yve__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
        <par n="l/yde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
        <par n="l/yve__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>r</i>
        <par n="r/yge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
        <par n="s/ynge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
        <par n="s/ynke__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tilb</i>
        <par n="tilb/yde__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>k</i>
        <par n="k/unne__vbmod"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sk</i>
        <par n="sk/ulle__vbmod"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>vil</i>
        <par n="vil/le__vbmod"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ak</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>bom</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>farvel</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fy</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>godaften</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>guuud</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hej</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hmm</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ih</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ja</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>javel</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>jo</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>la</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mmm</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>nej</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>nå</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>nåja</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>næh</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>oh</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ok</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>pyt</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tillykke</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ushh</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>værsgo</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>åh</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>øv</i>
        <par n="ak__ij"/>
      </e>
